Maryland, session 2025, SB0268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
15–106.8.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, an individual shall be
exempt from paying the out–of–state tuition rate at a public institution of higher education
in the State, and shall be eligible for the tuition rates described under subsections (c) and
(d) of this section, if the individual:
(4) Provides to the public institution of higher education documentation
that the individual or the individual’s parent or legal guardian has filed a Maryland income
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0268*

SENATE BILL 268
tax return annually for the [3–year] 2–YEAR period before the academic year in which the
tuition rate exemption would apply;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.